District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.20

Reports.

(a)

The Director of Government Ethics shall produce a quarterly report detailing:

(1)

The posture of each complaint it received, including whether an investigation was initiated, is ongoing, or has concluded;

(2)

The referrals made to and from the Ethics Board;

(3)

Fines and penalties imposed by the Ethics Board;

(4)

Allegations dismissed by the Ethics Board; and

(5)

Other action taken with regard to an allegation of a violation of the Code of Conduct.

(b)

The quarterly report shall be posted online.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 220, 59 DCR 1862